District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.32

Personal interest in contracts or transactions.

Any officer or employee of the District who is convicted of a violation of § 208 of Title 18, United States Code , shall forfeit his office or position.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 822, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 732

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1133.
1973 Ed., § 1-828.